Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.200

Notice of dissenters' rights.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is submitted for approval by a vote at a shareholders' meeting, the meeting notice must state that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this chapter and be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

(2) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 would be submitted for approval by a vote at a shareholders' meeting but for the provisions of *RCW 23B.11A.040, the offer made pursuant to *RCW 23B.11A.040 must state that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this chapter and be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

(3) If corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is submitted for approval without a vote of shareholders in accordance with RCW 23B.07.040, the shareholder consent described in RCW 23B.07.040(1)(b) and the notice described in RCW 23B.07.040(3)(a) must include a statement that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this chapter and be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

[2024 c 22 s 23; 2022 c 42 s 114; 2009 c 189 s 42; 2002 c 297 s 36; 1989 c 165 s 143.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 23B.11A.040 appears to be erroneous. RCW 23B.11A.045 was apparently intended.